hyph-idn.tex
.aca2
.adu4
.af5r
.ag5r
.aja4
.al3aw
.amu4k
.ana4ka
.ap7r
.ara4k
.as5w
.aya4k
.ba7ha
.bai4k
.ba5la
.ba3nga
.ba5ra
.bara3nga
.ba5t
.ber5al
.bi7sa
.bri7
.bu5t
.ca7h
.ca5ra
.cari4
.ci3l
.co3l
.cua5
.cu3l
.da7ha
.da7ma
.de3la
.de3nga
.dera4k
.determin3i
.determi4nism
.di5t
.do3la
.do3nga
.ece6
.eka5
.elo3
.emi5
.emp7er
.em6pera
.ence6
.eozo4
.ere4
.ga5la
.galu3
.ga5ra
.gasa4
.gera4k
.giri4
.ha7sa
.heliotro4
.heliotrop3
.ik5r
.in3ad
.in3ok
.is4o
.ja7h
.ja4il
.ja5l
.ja7ma
.ja3nga
.ja5p
.ja5ra
.ja4u
.je3nga
.ji5r
.jo5ra
.jo5t
.ju5ra
.ka7ha
.ka5na
.ka5pa
.ka5ta
.ke5na
.ke5sw
.ki3l
.ki5ra
.ku3la
.la7h
.la5ngi
.la5p
.leba5
.le3nga
.li3la
.li5na
.li5pa
.li5t
.lo5ka
.lo5na
.ma5lan
.me3la
.mena3nga
.me5ngi.
.mi2g
.mi7sa
.mu7ta
.nasiona3
.ng6
.ni7sa
.nu5ta
.op3l
.pa3nga
.pa5ra
.peja5l
.pe3lan
.pe4ng5aranga
.pe7ram
.pe6r3awan
.pe4rut
.po3la
.poli5
.pona4
.prog5r
.pu3la
.ra5p
.rara5
.ra7sa
.re3nga
.re4pan.
.ri3nga
.ro5t
.ru5p
.sa7ha
.sa7ma
.sa3nga
.sa5ra
.sa3u4k
.se3la
.sela5p
.semi4t
.se5nga
.se3ngi
.si5p
.ste7r
.su5na
.su5t
.ta7ha
.ta7ma
.ta3nga
.tari4kan
.te3la
.te3nga
.te6ram
.te7ran.
.te4r5el
.te4ri
.ter3is
.teta5p
.ti7h
.ti3la
.ti5ngi
.ti5ra
.to3l
.to5ra
.tro4i
.tu7ma
.tumpu4
.tu5p
.ula4k
.unda4
.ura4ka
.usi4
.wa5t
.za7ma
a1
aa4f
aa6h
aa6t3
4aba.
aba4i
4abak
4abar
aba7s
abe7r
abi4k
abo6tan
ab5r
abra4
3abs
4abun
abu7s
aca6n
6acar.
ace4
ace6m
aci4k
4acip
4acir
aco4
a4c5r
acu4
4adas
ada6t
4adea
4ader
ade6ra
3adh
3adi2l3
4adim
adisi5p4
ado4n
ad5r
a4dw
ae4nism
aer6
a2es
a4f3l
ag6a
aga4i
aga4l
4age4t
ag4i
4agi.
ag4o
ago5k
ag5ri
agu5k
4agu6m
agu6t
a4h
a5ha
a7hay
ahe6m
a7hi
ahi2l
ahi6man
ah3ism
ahi6t
a7ho
ahu6t
a2i
a5iah
a3i4b
a3id
ai4fa
a5ig
a5iki
a5ikk
a3ilo
a3imb
a3in
ai4na
ai4ng
a3i5p
a3i4r
ai7sa
a3ism
ai4ta
ait3i
4ajan
ajemu4
aji4b
3ajn
3ajo
aju5k
3aju3n
4akah
a5ke
a7kel
ak3em
4akit
a5k4lo
4akn
4akok
ako5s4
ak5r
a5kre
ak7s
aku6ma
4akup
a5lah
4alai
a5lak
a2lan
a4lan.
a5lang
a5lat
ale4d
ale6ma
ali4ba
4alic
5alie
a3lif
ali8h
a3lin
alo5t
4alut
a4m
4amai
ama4la
a6man
ama6ran
4ambah
3ambau
ambe4
4ambi.
4ambing
ambu4k
ame3l
amensa3
amensal4
amik4
ami5kr
4amit
amoder4
amodern3
4ampan
4ampas
ampe5
4ampi
ampi4k
4ampung
4ampus
4amuf
4amus
a5nag
a5n4ak
5anal
6anala
a4nan
4anci
4andar
4andas
ande4k
4andi
ando5k
4andu
ane4n
ang4a
a3ngab
a3ngam
a3ngani
a3ngas
4an4ge
ange4t
5anggo
ang4i
a3ngin
3angina
angi6r
a5ng4o
ang4u
a4ng5ul
4anib
an3ion
an3iri
3ann
an3opt
an6s5p
6antai
anta4ka
4anti.
4antin
4anto
a5nu
anu2i
4anv
anya8m
4ao
ao4k
apa4k
4apal
a4pan
4apark
ape6r
api3
5apki
a4p3l
4apm
a4p5r
ap6ro
ap7rof
ap6si
a6pso
4apt
apu4k
4apun.
apu5t
a3r
ar6a
a5raa
ara4ban
a5rans
a7ras
a5rat
arawi5
ar6e
are4t
are4u
arge4
a5r4i
6ari4b
6arih.
a5r4u
aru2l
aru6m
4asad
4asar
a2sf
4asid
4asih
4asim
asi4ti
as5k
as6kop
a6spa
asua3
asual4
asu4k
3asu5r
asyi4
a5tab
a7tai
atama7
a4tan
a5tap
5atapk
ata5u
ati8r3i
a5to
ato8s5f
a4t5r
at7ra
a5tu
6atup
atura3
atural4
4aua
a5uco
a5uhan
4auk
4aul
a3ulh
au6ma
a3un
au4na
au4nia
a4unik
a3ur
a5uran
4ausi
a3ut
4aut.
a5uta
a5util
a5utk
4av
ava3
4awa.
5awale
awa6ng
3awasi.
4awatk
a5y
ayah3
aya8ma
3ayo6m
4ayuh
azo6
3b
5baa
baba4
baca5
ba3ik
ba4ina
ba5ita
baja4
baji4k
bali4
ba4n3ism
bantu5
banya4
baru7s
bati4
ba3us
4bb
6bd
bebesa5
be7h
be3lan
bena8
be3nga
be5ng4i
be5ngu
benu6m
5ber3
be6ra
be7r4akuk
be7r4amban
be7rand
ber5angg
be7rani
be8r5anj
beranta2
ber5antu
bera7sa
ber5atap
be4r5em
be6r7embun
be4r5engg
be4rengk
be4rero
be4ri
ber5inai.
be5ring
be6ringat
be4r5ob
be4r5oks
be8r7ol
be4r5om
be4r5op
be6ror
bero5t
be4r5otak
be4ru
be5rua
ber5ungk
4bf
4b3g
4b7h
bia4k
bia4n
bi4ba
5bic
bi4dah
bi5k4r
bi5p8
bisi4k
bi4ta
bit4i
4bj
4b5k
4b3l
bla4k
5b4lisir
blo4n
5b4lura
4bm
4b3n
bobo5k
5b4oi
bo5na
bo4p3l
bo7sa
bo6s5k
bo5ta
bot3is
bo4tr
4b3r
bra3ng
bre4t
5b4rib
brono5
bru4
b4rut
4b5s6
4bt
bua4
buda4k
buku5
bu3la
bula4k
bu4na
buntu5k
bur4a
bu7rad
4bv
4b3y
bya4
4bz
3c4
cabu4
ca3i
ca4ik
ca4kan
ca3l
cali3
ca5na
canti4
ca4ta6
ca3us
ce4h
ceka4kan
cele4n
cema6
cemburu5
ce3ng4a
ce5ngi
ce5ngu
cermi6
ceta4
ce4tan
ciba4
cik5r
ci2la
ci5pa
ci6s
cole4
cope4
co4pl
core4
2cr
culi4
cupli4
3d
da4ban
dada2
dada4k
da2em
da4id
da3if
da3is
dama6
5da5t
dato5
da5un
4db
4dd6
4deali
de4f3l
de3g6re
de5kri
dela5
deli4kan
de3ngi
de5ng4u
denya6
depa5k
depo7s
dere4k
de5ri
desa2
deti4
de5t6ri
d6hi
di4f5r
di2g5l
di6h
di5kl
di5k4r
d4il
di5pa
dipe4
dip5l
di6so
dite7
di5t6r
diu3
6dk
4d3l
4dm
dma7s
dmi5t
4d5n
doa5
do2e
do4ka
dola5k
domi2
dongke4
do4ta
4d3r6
7dram
d5rat
dre2l
dri2a
d4rik
dro6b5
5drofoi
dro5na
dro5s
d5s4
dua3l4
du5ble
du4p
du5ple
du5p4lik.
4dv
2d4w
d5wa2
4d3y
e1
eada2
eaju6
eali6m
ea7ma
ea3ngi
eanti4
earti8
ea5t6
ea3us
ebai4
eba4k
ebe4k3i
ebe7ra
ebe8rag
ebe8rak
ebe8ran.
ebere8
ebe5r4i
ebo2g
ebo6m
ebra4
eb5ran
3ecer
eci4k
e4c5r
eda3l
3edar
edro4
edu5p4l
eek5s4
eeso5
ef3lo
e4fr
ega4k
e7ge
ege4k
egemu2
egemu4k
eg4i
e2gl
eg4o
4egolk
e2g5r
4eg4u
eido6
eikli6
eima8
eindu4
ei3ng
e2ini
einti6
3ejaw
ejengke4
e5ke
eki4ka
3ekono
eko5p6
ek4rim
5eksk
5eksp
3ekui
eku2is
eku3l
eku5r
ekutu5
elabe4
3elabo
elami6
e5lang
e9las
elasti4
ele3nga
ele5p
ele4tan.
elisi4
3elite
eliti4
elo3l
elo7s
elu4kan
e4m
ema5ngi
emanti4
emasa4k
ema3u
4emba
embai4
emba5ik
emba4kan
6embari
4embe
embi3l
4embung
7embunk
4embur
4eme
eme3nga
emera4k
5emig6
emo5r
4empa.
4empaa
6empak
4empi
empi4k
4empr
4emu
ena7ha
enai2
ena5p
5encel
enda7ha
3endap
eneo6
en4g
e4ngak
eng5akan
e4ngana
e4ng3engka
e4ngey
engga4k
eng5ini
e4ngis
eng3isi
engka4k
5engkau
engo5na
eng3oy
5engsel
e4ngu
e5ngulun
eng5utik
eni5t6
enja5r
enja5t
en7s6
enta4k
4ental
4entar
4entu
eo5
eob4
eodo5
eo3i
e3os
epa4kan
epa3u
epeli4
epe8r5angk
epe4rin
epi5sp
e4p3l
epo3n
e4p5r
e6prak.
e6pret
ep6ri
e6pris
epro3
e6p7rog
e6pru
epti6s3
epu4k
e5ra
er3abua
er3adat
e7rah
e7rai
er3air
e7raja
e7rak.
e6r3akar
er3akt
er3aku
er3ala
e6r3alu
e7ram.
4erama
e7rana
e7rang.
e7rans
e7ranta
er5antis
er3ara
e7rasa.
e7rasan
e7rasia
e7rasio
e7ratus
e7rawan.
e4reks
er3enak
ereome5
er5er
eresi4k
e5ria
e5rih
e5rik.
e5riko
e5ril
e5rin.
eri5na
e5ring.
e5ringan
er3inte
er3ion
eri2oni
eri5p
er3iso
e5rista
e5rit
erit4i
e5riu
e5riw
e4r3iz
erjo5r
erna4k
er5ol
e5ron.
e4ror
eros7ta
erte7ra
er3uba
e5rui
e5ruk.
er3ul
e7sa
esa4ka
6ese
eseda4
ese4k
e5sko
5esok
esto5r
esu6m
etama4
e5te
ete6ma
ete6rat
e5ti
eti4ka
eti6pl
5etn
e5to
eto4p
eto5s
e4t5r
e5t6rad
e5t6ros
etu7h
etu4kan.
e5ua
e3ub
e3ug
e5u2i
e3uj
e3ul
e3um
e3un
euni4k
eu5p4
e3us
eu7sa
eu5t6
e7v
5evak
ewa3
ewe2l
ewe6r
ewi3
3f
5fad
5fah
fa3i4
5fak
5fal
2fan
fa3n4g
fari3
5fas
fasi4k
fa4u
4fb
f5d4
fe5b4ri
7feri
4fh
fi5b4ra
fi5na
fi4rau
4fk
2fl
f3la
4f3n
5fo
fo5b4
fo6s5k
f4r
f5rek
f5ri
f5ro
4fs
4ft
5fu
fu3la
fu5ngi
g4aa
g4abat
g4abi
g4abu
g5abu.
g5abua
g5abuk
gabu4l
g5abur.
g3ac
g4aca
g5acah
g5acan.
g5acap
g5acar
gaci5k
g4adah
g4af
g5afia
g4a6h
g5ahad
gah3an
g5ahl
g4ai
ga4ir
ga3is
ga3it
g4aj
g5ajai
g5ajar
g5aju
g4aka
g5akal
g5akank
g5akar
g4aki.
g4akk
ga4kom
gak6re
ga3la
gala4k
g4alan.
g4ale
g4alik
g4alim
g4alk
g5alko
g4alung
ga7ma
g4amban
gamu4
gamu5f4
g4ana
g5anak
g6anak.
3ganat
g4andan
g4ang.
g4anga
g5angank
g4angkan
g4ank
g4ans
g4antan
g5anting
gapa5k
g4apk
gap5l
g4apo
g4apu
g5apun
g4ar
g5arab
g5arah
g5arans
g5aras
g6arin
g5ars
g5arti
garu2
garu4k
g5arus
g5arw
g4ase
g4ask
ga5s4p
g4a6s5t
g4at
g5atak
g5atap
g5atas
gato6
ga5t6re
g5atu
g6atu.
ga3u2l
ga3us
gawa4k
g4awal
g4awan
g4awi
g4aya
g5ayak
g5ayap
gayu5r
g3az
2g5b4
2g5d4
g3eban
gebu4
gece4k
ge5d4
g3edit
g3ef
gege6r
ge2i
g3eja.
g3ejaa
g3eje
ge5k4l
g3eko
g4ekol
g3eks
gek5s4plor
gek5st
g3elimi
g3elu.
g3elu5k
g3elus
g4ema
gema6r
g5emat
gembali5
g5emban.
g5embar
g5embat
gempa5k
g5empik
g5empin
g5emut
g3enakk
gena6p
g3encang.
g3ence6
g3endal.
g3endus
genge8
gengga8
g3enk
g3enyah
g3enyak
geo3
geog4
geos6
gepa4k
ge5p6re8
g3eratk
g3ereh
g3ereng
gerge6
ger6i
g3erot
gerta4
g3erti
geru4ka
gesa5k
g3esaka
gese6
3gest
geta6t
geti6
ge5t6r
g3ets
ge4u
g3ev
g3eye
2gf
g3g6
gga7s
gge4k
ggemu4k
ggera4k
gge6ran.
ggi6ra
ggota5
4g7h4
g3iba.
g3ibak
g3ibara
g3ibi
g3ibr
gibu4
g3ici
g3id
gi6h
g3ij
g3ik
g3ilai
g3ilar
g3ile
g3ilm
g3ilus
g3im
g3in
g4ina
g5inai
g5inap
g4incu
g4ing.
g4ini
g4ink
g4intil
3gio
gio6k5
g3ipu
gi5ra
g3iram
g3iras
g3isb
g3ise
g3isia
g3iso
g3isy
3giv
gjo5
2g5k6
gke4b
gke4d
gke6k
gke3la
gke6ran.
gki8h
gko2
gkra4
gku6m
g3l
2gla
4g7m
gmo2
gmog5
2g3n
g5na
gne6tis
g3ob
go4k
go6kl
g3oks
gole4
g4oli
g3omo
g3ompol
g3ompr
g3onar
g3ongk
g3op
g4opi
g3o5ra
g3orb
g5ord
gore8
g3oret
g3ork
g3orn
go7sa
go6sp
g3otaki
go4tr
gp6
g4r4
2gra.
g5rad
g5rak
g5rama
2g5re3
gre4k
2gri
4g5ro
g5ru
g7s4
gse4
gse2ka
gso4
gua2l
g5uap
g5uara
g3ub
g5uca
g5udut
g4uf
g5uik
g3uj
g4u4ka
g4ukk
g4uli
g5ulik
g5ulitk
g5ulur
g4uma
gundi4
g4une
g4ung.
g4ungkan
g4ungu
g4uni
g5unjungk
g4unk
g4uny
g5unyai
g4uran
g4ure4
g4urun
g4usal
g4usk
g4usuk
gu8sung.
g4u5t
g5utu
2g3y
3h
7had
haen3
7haf
9hah
5ha6i5
7hak
h3aks
ha5la
hala7m
hali5p
7ham
hampa5k
6han
4han.
7hana
7ha3ng
7hani
7hank
7hap
hap5l
7har
ha5ra
8h3art
7has
7hat
ha4ta
ha4ur
ha3us
7he
he3ng
he4u
h3g
5hi
6hibisionism
hi2g
hi6h
hi4lism
hi5pa
8hism
hi5t
8hk
6h3l
hli2l
8hm
4h3n
ho2la
ho4p3
ho6s
6h3r
8h7s
6ht
hter4
h4tub
5hu
hulu5
hu4na
hu5t
hwa7
h3y
i1
4ia
ia5k6r
ia5na
ian3is
ia4pa
i3as
ia4ta
3ibada
3ibai
4ibaran
ibe7
iber4a
ibi3l
i5b4le
ibo4l5
i5b4re
ibu4k
ice3
ici4
ide4n
idia5
idi4k
idi2l3
id3ism
idos5
4idu
idua4l5ism
idu4k
2i5e
i4fan
if3ism
i4f3l
if4lo
2ig
i5g6a
3igau
ige2
4i3g4i
ig4l
ig4o
igo5t
ig5ri
igu2l
igu5r
2i4h
4i5ha
iha4k
ih3ani
i7hi
ihi5d4
ihil5
5ihr
i7hu
ija4k
4iji4
2ika
3ikana
i4kh
4i5ki
iki4k
i6k5la
2i5ko
iko7s
ik4ri
ikroli4
ikrolin3
i3lai
i2l3ali
i3las
i3lat
ile3
ile4r
3ilh
i3l4i
ili4d
ili4k
2ilo
ilo5k
i3lu
i4m
ima4l
4imbah
imbol5
imbo4lism
ime6ra
i7mi
imig6
impa5k
4impal
imu3la
ina4i5
i4nan
in3art
ina5t
4inca
5incar
4inda.
inda4k
4indil
3indua
3induk.
3indus
ine5u
3inf
ing6a
i3ngam
i5ngar
i3ngas
5ingat
3ingata
in3gen
i3ng4i
in3g4li
in3g6re
5ingsu
ing4u
4init
inja4
inju5
5inko
ino6ma
in7s
inso4
3insp
3insu
3intia
4intik
3intr
inu6m
3inv
4iny
inya4k
iodemo6
iodemok5
io5ka
3ionk
io5s4
iot3is
i4pan
ipe4r5
i4p3l
ipla4
ip5lak
ip4le
i4pr
3ip5ri
ipu4k
i4q
i3r
i5r4ad
i7rang
irasia4
irasial5
i5rat
ir3aun
ire4p
i7ri
4irika
4iri6m
iri4tism
iro5
iros8
4i5ru
i4s
3isap
i6s3ast
3isei
i6seku
isemit4
4isik.
i6s3int
2isit
is5k
isome5
i7son
is3or
is4por
4ista
3istil
3istim
3istir
isti6s3
istri4k
3isuk
i5sy
ita4ba
i4tan
ita4ni
i5tans
iter6a
iti4kan
iti6p
it3ism
iti4v3ism
ito4t5r
i4t5r
i5u2
iul3
4iu6m
iu4n
iu4p
iure5
iu6s
4iw
iwe6
i7y
iya5
izi4
3j
ja4dan
ja2gr
ja3i
ja5ia
ja4in
ja3l
jama4
jamba4
jami6
jampi5
jara4b
ja3uh
jawa4
4jb
4jd
jega4
je4h
jeje6r
je4k
je3l4
jele4k
jemba5
jenge4
je5ngu
jenti4
jera5p
je5ri
ji4dan
ji2gr
jina4k
jine6
ji5pa
4j3l
jlo4
4jm
4j3n
jo2gl
jo7h
jo4k
jo3nga
jo6s
jo4ta
4j3r
4jt
jua2
ju4ka
ju6mat.
jumu4
ju4na
ju5p
4jw
3k
k6a
5kad
5ka6h
ka3im
ka3it
5kak
kaka4k
5kal
kali3
5kana
kana4k
5kang
5kano
5kant
kapi5t
5kar
kara5pa
ka5re
7kas
kase4t
5kat
ka4ta
kati5f
ka3u2l
ka3um
kawa4k
kawa7s
kaya3
4kb4
kbe7
k5bl
4kc
kco4
4kd
ke5br
k4ed
ke5f
ke3g6
ke7h
ke5k4
kelaba4
kela3i4
kele4kan
k4emb
kempu5
keo6k
ke5pr
kep6res
ker4a
ke7rak
kere5t
ker6i
keri4kan
kerla6
ke4robo
ke5s4p
ke5s4te
kete4ri
ke5t6ren
ke5u
4k3g6
k8h
5kha
4khd
4khk
4khl
4khr
4khs
4kht
kia2l
ki7h
kiku4
k6im
ki6man
ki5pa
kisi4k
4kj
kju4
6k5k4
4k3l4
kla4k
kle3i
kli4kan
k4lor
klu4k
klu6man
4km
kma4
6k3n
kng4
koba4k
ko6dr
kole4t
kome5tri.
5kon
ko5na
ko4ng
kon3ge
5kopa
ko4pan
ko5ra
ko5s4tr
4kp
4kr
k4ra
k5rab
kra4ba
6krah
k6ran
k5rap
kra6r
5kras
kra4t3ism
5k4rea
5k4reo
kri7sa
k6rit
k4roi
6k5rol
6ks
k7sa
ksa7m
kse8sa
k5s4pa
k5s4pe
k5s4to
6k5t6
kte5r6
kto5
ktob4
5ku
kua7s
kui5t
kupa4k
4kw
4k3y
kya4
4kz
labo5
4labs
laca4
2la4dh
la4fan
3lag
3lah
la3iku
lai6m
l3ait
2l3aja
6l3akh
la3l
lala4k
la6m3ism
2lan.
3lana
3land
3lang
langki7
l4ann
3lans
lanta2
lanti4
3lany
3lap
la5p6r
lari4k
la4ur
la3ust
la5ut
lawa4k
laya4
lazi6
4lb
2lc
2l5d4
l4e
5lea
leb4
lebe8
le5bri
led4
leda4
le3g6
lega5ka
le4h
le2i
5lel
lele6
lembe4
lemo5
le5na
leng4a
le5ngu
lepe4
lere4
3les
lese4
le7ti
2lf
l4f5r
2l3g
lga8man
2lh
5lia
lian4i
liglo4
4lihr
li5k4l
li5k4r
limpa5na
limpu3
2lindur
li2osk
li5plo
li5pr
liri4
5li7sa
2l3ism
li5s4pe
3liu
4lj
4lk
l5ka
lk5l
2l3l
4lm
lma2lu
2l3n
lobo4
lo6dro
lo2gan
lo5h
lo7ha
2l3o6kl
lono6s5
lo5ra
